New York, session 2025-2026, A5901.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 99-h of the state finance law, as 2 amended by section 8 of chapter 174 of the laws of 2013, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 3. Moneys of the account, following the segregation of appropriations 5 enacted by the legislature, shall be available for purposes including 6 but not limited to: (a) reimbursements or payments to municipal govern- 7 ments that host tribal casinos pursuant to a tribal-state compact for 8 costs incurred in connection with services provided to such casinos or 9 arising as a result thereof, for economic development opportunities and 10 job expansion programs authorized by the executive law; provided, howev- 11 er, that for any gaming facility located in the county of Erie or 12 Niagara, the municipal governments hosting the facility shall collec- 13 tively receive a minimum of twenty-five percent of the negotiated 14 percentage of the net drop from electronic gaming devices the state 15 receives pursuant to the compact and provided further that for any 16 gaming facility located in the county or counties of Cattaraugus, Chau- 17 tauqua or Allegany, the municipal governments of the state hosting the 18 facility shall collectively receive a minimum of twenty-five percent of 19 the negotiated percentage of the net drop from electronic gaming devices 20 the state receives pursuant to the compact; and provided further that 21 pursuant to chapter five hundred ninety of the laws of two thousand 22 four, a minimum of twenty-five percent of the revenues received by the 23 state pursuant to the state's compact with the St. Regis Mohawk tribe 24 shall be made available to the counties of Franklin and St. Lawrence, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09470-01-5 A. 5901 2 1 and affected towns in such counties. Each such county and its affected 2 towns shall receive fifty percent of the moneys made available by the 3 state; and provided further that the state shall annually make [twenty- 4 five] thirty percent of the negotiated percentage of the net drop from 5 all gaming devices the state actually receives pursuant to the Oneida 6 Settlement Agreement confirmed by section eleven of the executive law 7 available to the county of Oneida, thirty percent of the negotiated 8 percentage of the net drop from all gaming devices located within the 9 county of Oneida for which the state actually receives payment, twenty- 10 five percent of the negotiated percentage of the net drop from all 11 gaming devices located within the county of Madison for which the state 12 actually receives payment and a sum of three and one-half million 13 dollars to the county of Madison. Additionally, the state shall distrib- 14 ute, for a period of nineteen and one-quarter years, an additional annu- 15 al sum of two and one-half million dollars to the county of Oneida. 16 Additionally, the state shall distribute the one-time eleven million 17 dollar payment actually received by the state pursuant to the Oneida 18 Settlement Agreement to the county of Madison by wire transfer upon 19 receipt of such payment by the state; and (b) support and services of 20 treatment programs for persons suffering from gambling addictions. 21 Moneys not segregated for such purposes shall be transferred to the 22 general fund for the support of government during the fiscal year in 23 which they are received. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect June 1, 2025 and shall be deemed in 25 full force and effect on the date the state actually receives payment 26 from gaming devices located in Oneida county and Madison county.